Utah statutes.
48-2c-1506.   Activity limitations.

No professional services company may do anything that is prohibited to be done by individuals licensed to practice the profession that the company is organized to render.



Enacted by Chapter 260, 2001 General Session 

Repealed by Chapter 353, 2011 General Session

